New York, session 2025-2026, S5621.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. The legislature hereby finds that emer- 2 gency personnel are trained to look for intoxication, but not trained to 3 ask a patient if they identify as a person in substance use recovery. 4 People in recovery work extremely hard to maintain recovery and should 5 not be placed in a situation where their recovery is compromised. The 6 legislature finds that emergency personnel need to be trained in how to 7 communicate the risks of certain medications that could compromise the 8 person's recovery and what possible alternatives are available. 9 § 2. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 3000-g 10 to read as follows: 11 § 3000-g. Prehospital emergency medical services; substance use recov- 12 ery. 1. The department, the state council, and the regional council 13 shall include in their policies, procedures, and protocols for prehospi- 14 tal emergency medical services and transportation, standards for the 15 assessment and treatment of patients who identify as a person in 16 substance use recovery. Such policies, procedures, and protocols shall 17 include point-of-entry criteria and plans for the triage and transport 18 of individuals who identify as a person in substance use recovery. At 19 minimum such policies, procedures, and protocols shall require emergency 20 medical services and transportation providers to communicate to individ- 21 uals who identify as a person in substance use recovery the risks of 22 certain medications that could compromise such individuals' recovery by 23 offering alternate options for treatment and informing the hospital that 24 such individual identifies as a person in substance use recovery. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02997-01-5 S. 5621 2 1 2. Beginning upon the effective date of this section, the department, 2 the state council, and the regional council shall annually review and 3 update, if appropriate, their policies, procedures, and protocols for 4 prehospital emergency medical services and transportation to ensure 5 individuals who identify as a person in substance use recovery are 6 receiving adequate information prior to treatment. 7 § 3. Section 3053 of the public health law, as amended by chapter 445 8 of the laws of 1993, is amended to read as follows: 9 § 3053. Reporting. 1. Advanced life support first response services 10 and ambulance services registered or certified pursuant to article thir- 11 ty of this chapter shall submit detailed individual call reports on a 12 form to be provided by the department, or may submit data electronically 13 in a format approved by the department. The state emergency medical 14 services council, with the approval of the commissioner, may adopt rules 15 and regulations permitting or requiring ambulance services whose volume 16 exceeds twenty thousand calls per year to submit call report data elec- 17 tronically. Such rules shall define the data elements to be submitted, 18 and may include requirements that assure availability of data to the 19 regional emergency medical advisory committee. 20 2. Such individual call report form, and such form's alternative elec- 21 tronic format, shall include whether an individual identifies as a 22 person in substance use recovery and, if known, such individual's type 23 of addiction disease. 24 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.